src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
а̄гирищ+v1+N:а̄гирищ N_NOSYNCS "девочка" ; !!≈ * @CODE@ CHECKME
а̄гирищ+v2+N:а̄гӣрищ N_NOSYNCS "дочка//дочь" ;
а̄гирищ+v3+N:агирищ N_NOSYNCS "дочка//дочь" ;
а̄мыщ+N:а̄мыщ N_SYNCS "загадка" ;
а̄пр+N:а̄пр N_VCCH "прыть" ;
а̄ӈкпыг+N:а̄ӈк#пыг N_NOSYNCH "двоюродный брат /сын тётки/" ;
алфавит+N:алфавит N_VCH "алфавит /азбука/" ;
алыщ+N:алыщ N_SYNCS "оружие" ;
апыг+N:апыг N_NOSYNCH "внук" ;
артист+N:артист N_VCCH "артист" ;
багаж+N:багаж N_VCS "багаж" ;
бидон+N:бидон N_VCH "бидон" ;
ва̄тахум+N:ва̄тахум N_NOSYNCH "купец" ;
вельбот+N:вельбот N_VCH "вельбот" ;
винт+N:винт N_VCCH "винт" ;
витуй+N:витуй N_VCS "бобр" ;
ворвань+N:ворвань N_VCS "ворвань" ;
вотас+N:вотас N_VCH "пурга" ;
выигрыш+N:выигрыш N_NOSYNCH "выигрыш" ;
герой+N:герой N_VCS "герой" ;
горнист+N:горнист N_VCCH "горнист" ;
живопись+N:живопись N_VCS "живопись" ;
зверовод+N:зверовод N_VCH "зверовод" ;
импорт+N:импорт N_VCCH "импорт" ;
календарь+N:календарь N_VCS "календарь" ;
камыш+N:камыш N_NOSYNCH "камыш" ;
кант+N:кант N_VCCH "зло /что-л дурное/" ;
ке̄лппил+N:ке̄лппил N_VCH "смородина /красная/" ;
ке̄нт+N:ке̄нт N_VCCH "шапка" ;
кисель+N:кисель N_VCS "кисель" ;
колрищ+N:колрищ N_NOSYNCS "лачуга" ;
коммунист+N:коммунист N_VCCH "коммунист" ;
консуп+N:консуп N_NOSYNCH "гребень /для волос/" ;
кровать+N:кровать N_VCS "кровать" ;
кувыщ+N:кувыщ N_SYNCS "гусь /меховая одёжда/" ;
кӯньгил+N:кӯньгил N_VCH "улыбка" ;
кӯтюврищ+N:кӯтюврищ N_NOSYNCS "щенок" ;
ларыщ+N:ларыщ N_SYNCS "хвощ /растение/" ;
лещ+N:лещ N_VCS "лещ" ;
лозунг+N:лозунг N_VCCH "лозунг" ;
лум+N:лум N_NOSYNCH "жар" ;
лю̄ль+N:лю̄ль N_VCS "гадкий" ;
ма̄гва̄руп+N:ма̄гва̄руп N_NOSYNCH "овод" ;
ма̄гня̄нь+N:ма̄гня̄нь N_VCS "desert" ;
ма̄кол+N:ма̄кол N_VCH "землянка" ;
ма̄та̄прищ+N:ма̄та̄прищ N_NOSYNCS "мышка//мышь" ;
ма̄хв+N:ма̄хв N_VCCH "обух" ;
матаприщ+N:матаприщ N_NOSYNCS "мышь" ;
ме̄тхум+N:ме̄тхум N_NOSYNCH "слуга" ;
мебель+N:мебель N_VCS "мебель" ;
мувиньт+N:мувиньт N_VCCH "смех" ;
мӯйхум+N:мӯйхум N_NOSYNCH "гость" ;
нак+N:нак N_VCH "этаж" ;
нып+N:нып N_NOSYNCH "берестяной остов котомки" ;
ня̄ньпум+N:ня̄ньпум N_NOSYNCH "хлеб /колос/" ;
ня̄ртпум+N:ня̄ртпум N_NOSYNCH "зелень" ;
ня̄руй+N:ня̄руй N_VCS "червь" ;
нё̄выль+N:нё̄выль N_SYNCS "мясо" ;
о̄парищ+N:о̄парищ N_NOSYNCS "дед" ;
олнкас+N:олнкас N_VCH "кошелёк" ;
па̄рс+N:па̄рс N_VCCH "прок" ;
па̄рыс+N:па̄рыс N_NOSYNCH "барыш" ;
пещат+N:пещат N_VCH "печать /предмет/" ;
пионервожатый+N:пионервожатый N_VCS "пионервожатый" ;
пищ+N:пищ N_NOSYNCS "смысл" ;
пищ-пищ+N:пищ-пищ N_NOSYNCS "мышь" ;
по̄льщаӈщирищ+N:по̄льщаӈщирищ N_NOSYNCS "снегирь" ;
полыщ+N:полыщ N_SYNCS "клевета" ;
пост+N:пост N_VCCH "пост /служебный/" ;
почтальон+N:почтальон N_VCH "почтальон" ;
пристань+N:пристань N_VCS "пристань" ;
пувтуп+N:пувтуп N_NOSYNCH "острога" ;
пумто̄слуп+N:пумто̄слуп N_NOSYNCH "кузнечик" ;
пӯрыщ+N:пӯрыщ N_SYNCS "свинья" ;
рис+N:рис N_VCH "рис" ;
са̄йт+N:са̄йт N_VCCH "прут" ;
са̄лйуй+N:са̄лйуй N_VCS "волк / волчий" ;
саймпум+N:саймпум N_NOSYNCH "лук /растение/" ;
сарыч+N:сарыч N_SYNCS "сарыч" ;
сбор+N:сбор N_VCH "сбор" ;
соловей+N:соловей N_VCS "соловей" ;
суп+N:суп N_NOSYNCH "платье" ;
сыр+N:сыр N_NOSYNCH "сыр" ;
сыщик+N:сыщик N_VCH "сыщик" ;
сэ̄кв+N:сэ̄кв N_VCCH "прохлада" ;
та̄ннё̄выль+N:та̄ннё̄выль N_SYNCS "мускул" ;
техникум+N:техникум N_NOSYNCH "техникум" ;
товарищ+N:товарищ N_NOSYNCS "товарищ" ;
товсакв+N:товсакв N_VCCH "хворост" ;
трактор+N:трактор N_VCH "трактор" ;
трамвай+N:трамвай N_VCS "трамвай" ;
тыстыл-во̄щлыл+N:тыстыл-во̄щлыл N_NOSYNCH "горе" ;
фронт+N:фронт N_VCCH "фронт" ;
ха̄йтнут+N:ха̄йтнут N_VCH "волк" ;
харӈай+N:харӈай N_VCS "ржавчина" ;
хаснэ̄хум+N:хаснэ̄хум N_NOSYNCH "секретарь" ;
цирк+N:цирк N_VCCH "цирк" ;
чемодан+N:чемодан N_VCH "чемодан" ;
ща̄рыщ+N:ща̄рыщ N_SYNCS "море" ;
що̄ссуп+N:що̄ссуп N_NOSYNCH ;
э̄лумхо̄лас+N+Use/NG:э̄лмхо̄лас N_VCH "человек" ;
э̄ткотиль+N:э̄ткотиль N_VCS "полночь" ;
юртпы̄грищ+N:юртпы̄грищ N_NOSYNCS "друг" ;
юртхум+N:юртхум N_NOSYNCH "друг" ;
я̄ӈк+N:я̄ӈк N_VCCH "лёд" ;
ӯй+N:ӯй N_VCS "зверь" ;
ӯйрищ+N:ӯй#рищ N_NOSYNCS "птичка" ;
ӯлыщ+N:ӯлыщ N_SYNCS "скула" ;
ӯсмасам+N:ӯсмасам N_VCH "сетка//ячея" ;
заказник+N:заказник N_VCH ;
терроризм+N:терроризм N_VCCH ;
не̄выррищ+N:не̄выррищ N_VCS ;
йӣгрищ+v2+N:йигрищ N_VCS ;
фонд+N:фонд N_VCCH ;
слесарьаппаратчик+N:слесарь#аппаратчик N_VCH ;
компонент+N:компонент N_VCCH ;
лауреат+N:лауреат N_VCH ;
вахмистр+N:вахмистр N_VCCH ;
